New York, session 2025-2026, A9188.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 168-b 2 to read as follows: 3 § 168-b. Designation of months of commemoration. 1. A month of commem- 4 oration is a calendar month so designated by this section or a calendar 5 month in any one year so designated by a proclamation of the governor or 6 resolution of the senate and assembly jointly adopted. 7 2. A month of commemoration shall not constitute a holiday or half-ho- 8 liday but shall be a month set aside in recognition and special honor of 9 a person, persons, group ideal or goal. 10 3. The following month shall be a month of commemoration in each year: 11 May, to be known as "Elder Appreciation Month". 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 13 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13279-01-5